Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 2. Replevin for Beasts Distrained

§ 5321.
When maintainable.

If beasts are distrained or impounded to recover a penalty or forfeiture alleged to have been incurred by their going at large or to obtain satisfaction for damages alleged to have been done by them, the owner thereof may maintain an action of replevin therefor.

Parties.

Section does not contemplate that writ will be brought against poundkeeper, but against impounder. Mellen v. Moody, 23 Vt. 674, 1851 Vt. LEXIS 90 (1851).

§ 5322.
Judgment for defendant.

When it appears upon the nonsuit of the plaintiff, or upon trial, that the beasts were lawfully taken or distrained, the defendant shall have judgment for such sum as is due from the plaintiff for the penalty or forfeiture or for the damages for which the beasts were impounded, with the legal fees and charges incurred by the distress, and the costs of the action of replevin.

§ 5323.
Judgment for plaintiff.

When it appears upon the default of the defendant or upon trial that the beasts were taken or distrained without justifiable cause, the plaintiff shall have judgment for his or her damages caused thereby, and his or her costs.